Washington statutes.
RCW 7.40.180

Motion to dissolve or modify.

Motions to dissolve or modify injunctions may be made in open court, or before a judge of the superior court, at any time after reasonable notice to the adverse party.

[ 1891 c 36 s 1; Code 1881 s 169; 1877 p 34 s 169; 1869 p 40 s 167; 1854 p 154 s 127; RRS s 735.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: CR 65.